Tennessee, session 114, SB2304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Fluoride-Free
Water Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-711, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( )
(A) The adding of fluoride or a fluoride-containing compound to drinking
water that is intended for human consumption and delivered to consumers
through a public water system located in this state by the owner or operator of
the public water system.
(B) The prohibition in subdivision ( )(A) applies to:
(i) All forms of fluoride, including, but not limited to:
SB2304
009225
- 1 -

(a) Sodium fluoride;
(b) Fluorosilicic acid; and
(c) Sodium fluorosilicate; and
(ii) All compounds intended to raise fluoride levels in water.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-708(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-709, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting the following:
(a) If the quarterly analysis of a water sample from a public water system by a
certified laboratory confirms that the level of naturally occurring fluoride in the sample
exceeds the maximum contaminant level goal (MCLG) for fluoride established by the
U.S. environmental protection agency (EPA), the public water system from which the
sample was taken must:
(1) Obtain laboratory analysis of water samples monthly for fluoride
levels;
(2) Take corrective action to reduce the level of naturally occurring
fluoride to a level at or below the MCLG for fluoride established by the EPA; and
(3) Notify all of its customers that a water sample tested exceeded the
MCLG for fluoride established by the EPA in a manner established by the
department.
(b) Once the monthly analysis of water samples for fluoride conducted pursuant
to subdivision (a)(1) confirms that the fluoride level in samples is less than the MCLG for
fluoride established by the EPA for three (3) consecutive months, the public water
system may resume quarterly laboratory analysis for fluoride.
- 2 - 009225

SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-713(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting the following:
(1)
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B), a person who violates or
fails to comply with this part, an order of the commissioner or the board issued
pursuant to this part, or a rule, regulation, or standard adopted pursuant to this
part is subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for each day of violation.
(B) A person who violates or fails to comply with Section 2 or 4 of this
act, an order of the commissioner or the board issued pursuant to Section 2 or 4
of this act, or a rule, regulation, or standard adopted pursuant to Section 2 or 4 of
this act is subject to a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for each day of violation.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 53, is amended by adding the following
as a new chapter:
53-16-101.
(a) It is a violation of this chapter for a person to sell, offer for sale, or distribute
or dispense for consideration bottled water containing added fluoride within this state.
(b) The prohibition in subsection (a) applies to:
(1) All forms of fluoride, including, but not limited to:
(A) Sodium fluoride;
(B) Fluorosilicic acid; and
(C) Sodium fluorosilicate; and
(2) All compounds intended to raise fluoride levels in water.
53-16-102.
- 3 - 009225

(a) Bottled water containing naturally occurring fluoride that is sold, offered for
sale, or distributed or dispensed for consideration in this state must be clearly labeled
with the fluoride concentration.
(b) If the concentration level of naturally occurring fluoride in bottled water that is
sold, offered for sale, or distributed or dispensed for consideration in this state exceeds
seven-tenths of a milligram per liter (0.7 mg/L), the bottle must be clearly labeled with
the following warning:
WARNING: This product contains fluoride at levels exceeding the recommended
limit for optimal health.
53-16-103.
(a) An agent of the commissioner of agriculture who has probable cause to
believe that bottled water is being sold, offered for sale, or distributed or dispensed for
consideration in violation of § 53-16-101 or § 53-16-102 shall mark the article as
"detained" or "embargoed" and petition a judge for an order of condemnation pursuant to
§ 53-1-201.
(b) A violation of § 53-16-101 or § 53-16-102 is punishable by a civil penalty of
five hundred dollars ($500). Each bottle of water that is sold, offered for sale, or
distributed or dispensed for consideration in violation of § 53-16-101 or § 53-16-102 is a
separate violation.
(c)
(1) The commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's designee shall
establish a process by which violations of this chapter may be reported.
(2) The attorney general and reporter may bring an action against a
person who violates this chapter to enjoin further violations and to recover a civil
penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.
- 4 - 009225

(3) A civil penalty collected pursuant to this section must be paid into the
general fund of this state.
(4) The prevailing party in an action brought under subdivision (c)(2) is
entitled to reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and expenses, but court costs
must not be taxed against the attorney general and reporter or this state in
actions commenced under this section.
(5) Jurisdiction for an action brought pursuant to this section is in the
chancery court of Davidson County or the chancery court in the county where the
person against whom the action is brought is located.
53-16-104.
The department of agriculture shall promulgate rules to effectuate this chapter.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 7. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 8. This act takes effect upon becoming a law for the purpose of promulgating
rules, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2026,
the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 009225